Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-1374
Improvements on
leased public lands; assessment; change
of ownership; filing required; collection of tax.

Improvements on leased public lands shall be assessed, together
with the value of the lease, to the owner of the improvements as real property.
On or before March 1, following any construction thereof or any change in
the improvements made on or before January 1, the owner of the improvements
shall file with the county assessor an assessment application on a form prescribed
by the Tax Commissioner. An
assessment application shall also be filed with the county assessor at the
time a change of ownership occurs, and such assessment application shall be
signed by the owner of the improvements. The taxes imposed on
the improvements shall be collected in the same manner as in all other cases
of collection of taxes on real property.

Laws 1903, c. 73, § 35, p. 396;

R.S.1913, § 6320;

C.S.1922, § 5921;

C.S.1929, § 77-1408;

R.S.1943, § 77-1209;

Laws 1963, c. 447, § 1, p. 1471;

Laws 1974, LB 969, § 1;

Laws 1987, LB 508, § 30;

R.S.1943, (1990), § 77-1209;

Laws 1992, LB 1063, § 111;

Laws 1992, Second Spec. Sess., LB 1, § 84;

Laws 1997, LB 270, § 82;

Laws 2007, LB334, § 76;

Laws 2012, LB1106, § 1.

Cited in background discussion relating to ownership of improvements on school lands. State v. Rosenberger, 187 Neb. 726, 193 N.W.2d 769 (1972).

Under facts in this case improvements on Missouri River port and terminal area held to be owned by city of Omaha and not taxable. Sioux City & New Orleans Barge Lines, Inc. v. Board of Equalization of Douglas County, 186 Neb. 690, 185 N.W.2d 866 (1971).

Improvements placed on leased public land are assessed to owner of the improvements. Banks v. State, 181 Neb. 106, 147 N.W.2d 132 (1966).

Leased public lands means lands belonging to public which have been leased as authorized by law. Offutt Housing Co. v. County of Sarpy, 160 Neb. 320, 70 N.W.2d 382 (1955).

Property of this description is to be listed in the locality where it is found. Nye-Schneider-Fowler Co. v. Boone County, 102 Neb. 742, 169 N.W. 436 (1918); Nye-Schneider-Fowler Co. v. Boone County, 99 Neb. 383, 156 N.W. 773 (1916).

Real and personal property of the state and its governmental subdivisions that is leased to a private party for any purpose other than a public purpose shall be subject to property taxes as if the property were owned by the lessee. Reynolds v. Keith Cty. Bd. of Equal., 18 Neb. App. 616, 790 N.W.2d 455 (2010).

Lessee's interest in housing project constructed on land owned by federal government was subject to taxation. Offutt Housing Co. v. County of Sarpy, 351 U.S. 253 (1956).